Utah statutes.
61-2g-203.   Division to publish roster of appraisers.

(1)  The division shall prepare and issue at least once each calendar year a roster of appraisers containing the information required by the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council.  The division shall transmit the roster to the Federal Financial Institutions Examinations Council at least annually.

(2)  The division may, upon payment of a fee established by the division in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, issue to a person a verified history of a person:

(a)  licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter; or

(b)  previously registered, licensed, or certified under this chapter.

